Illinois, session 104th, HB2940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-806.7 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-806.7)7    Sec. 3-806.7. Registration fees for active duty military 8personnel and veterans.9    (a) Beginning with the 2011 registration year, the 10standard registration fee set forth in Section 3-806 of this 11Code for passenger motor vehicles of the first division and 12motor vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 138,000 pounds and registered under Section 3-815 of this Code, 14shall be reduced by 50% for any Illinois vehicle owner who was 15on active duty as a member of the Armed Forces of the United 16States and stationed outside of the United States for a period 17of 90 days or longer during the preceding registration year. 18    (b) Illinois residents who are members of the Armed Forces 19of the United States and who have been stationed outside of the 20United States for a period of 6 months or longer, and who 21placed their registered motor vehicle in storage during the 22time they served abroad, shall be entitled to credit for the 23unused portion of that registration when they renew the   HB2940- 2 -LRB104 08904 LNS 18959 b1registration of that vehicle upon their return to the United 2States. For each month or part thereof that the vehicle was in 3storage and had current registration, the member of the armed 4forces shall receive one month of registration without charge. 5    (c) Beginning with the 2017 registration year, the 6standard registration fee set forth in Section 3-806 of this 7Code for passenger motor vehicles of the first division and 8motor vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 98,000 pounds and registered under Section 3-815 of this Code, 10shall be waived for the year following the return of any 11Illinois vehicle owner who is a member of the active-duty or 12reserve component of the United States Armed Forces who can 13provide proof of serving in a combat mission. Nothing in this 14subsection is applicable to the additional fees incurred by 15specialty, personalized, or vanity license plates. 16    (d) Beginning with the 2026 registration year, the 17standard registration fee under Section 3-806 of this Code for 18passenger motor vehicles of the first division and motor 19vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 8,000 20pounds and registered under Section 3-815 of this Code shall 21be $100 for any Illinois vehicle owner who has been issued a 22drivers license with a veteran's designation under subsection 23(e-5) of Section 6-110 of this Code. Nothing in this 24subsection (d) prevents the application of the registration 25fee waiver provided under subsection (c) of this Section.26(Source: P.A. 99-32, eff. 7-10-15.)